Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.310

Department to administer chapter—Rules and regulations—Guidance of federal seed act.

The department shall administer, enforce, and carry out the provisions of this chapter and may adopt regulations necessary to carry out its purpose. The adoption of regulations shall be subject to a public hearing and all other applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act), as enacted and hereafter amended.

The department when adopting regulations in respect to the seed industry shall consult with affected parties, such as growers, conditioners, and distributors of seed. Any final regulation adopted shall be based upon the requirements and conditions of the industry and shall be for the purpose of promoting the well-being of the purchasers and users of seed as well as the members of the seed industry.

When seed labeling, terms, methods of sampling and analysis, and tolerances are not specifically stated in this chapter or otherwise designated by the department, the department shall, in order to promote uniformity, be guided by officially recognized associations, or regulations under The Federal Seed Act.

[ 1981 c 297 s 9; 1969 c 63 s 31.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.